North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 21. Licenses and Permits Issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

§ 113-270.1.
License agents.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule provide for the appointment of persons as license agents to sell licenses and permits that the Commission is authorized to issue by this Subchapter or by any other provisions of law. To facilitate the convenience of the public, the efficiency of administration, the need to keep statistics and records affecting the conservation of wildlife resources, boating, water safety, and other matters within the jurisdiction of the Wildlife Resources Commission, and the need to issue licenses and permits containing special restrictions, the Wildlife Resources Commission may issue licenses and permits in any particular category through:

License agents.

The Wildlife Resources Commission’s headquarters.

Employees of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Two or more such sources simultaneously.

(a1)

When there are substantial reasons for differing treatment, the Wildlife Resources Commission may issue a type of license or permit by one method in one locality and by another method in another locality.

License agents may charge a fee of two dollars ($2.00) per transaction for licenses or permits issued.

(b1)

When licenses or permits are to be issued by license agents as provided by subsection (a) of this section, the Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules to provide for any of the following:

Qualifications of the license agents.

Duties of the license agents.

Methods and procedures to ensure accountability and security for proceeds and unissued licenses and permits.

Types and amounts of evidence that a license agent must submit to relieve the agent of responsibility for losses due to occurrences beyond the control of the agent.

Any other reasonable requirement or condition that the Wildlife Resources Commission deems necessary to expedite and control the issuance of licenses and permits by license agents.

(b2)

The Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules to authorize the Executive Director to take any of the following actions related to license agents:

(1)

Select and appoint license agents in areas most convenient for the sale of licenses and permits.

(2)

Limit the number of license agents in an area if necessary for efficiency of operation.

(3)

Require prompt and accurate reporting and remittance of public funds or documents by license agents.

(4)

Conduct periodic and special audits of accounts.

(5)

Suspend or terminate the authorization of any license agent found to be noncompliant with rules adopted by the Wildlife Resources Commission or when State funds or property are reasonably believed to be in jeopardy.

Require the immediate surrender of all equipment, forms, licenses, permits, records, and State funds and property, issued by or belonging to the Wildlife Resources Commission, in the event of the termination of a license agent.

(b3)

The Wildlife Resources Commission is exempt from the contested case provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes with respect to determinations of whether to authorize or terminate the authority of a person to sell licenses and permits as a license agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

(b4)

If any check or bank account draft of any license agent for the issuance of licenses or permits shall be returned by the banking facility upon which the same is drawn for lack of funds, the license agent shall be liable to the Commission for a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount of the check or bank account draft, but in no event shall the penalty be less than five dollars ($5.00) or more than two hundred dollars ($200.00). License agents shall be assessed a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) of their issuing fee on all remittances to the Commission after the fifteenth day of the month immediately following the month of sale.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 3.2. See notes for contingent effective date.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for a license agent to do any of the following:

Withhold or misappropriate funds from the sale of licenses or permits.

Falsify records of licenses or permits sold.

Willfully and knowingly assist or allow a person to obtain a license or permit for which the person is ineligible.

Willfully issue a backdated license or permit.

Willfully include false information or omit material information on records, licenses, or permits regarding either:

A person’s entitlement to a particular license or permit.

The applicability or term of a particular license or permit.

Charge or accept any additional fee, remuneration, or other item of value in association with any activity set out in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this subsection.

through (j) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 3.2. See notes for contingent effective date.

History.

1961, c. 352, ss. 4, 9; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1985, c. 791, s. 34; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1993, c. 539, ss. 852, 853; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2005-455, s. 3.2; 2013-283, s. 15.

§ 113-270.1A.
Hunter safety course required.

Except as provided in subsections (a1) and (d) of this section, on or after July 1, 2013, a person, regardless of age, may not procure a hunting license in this State without producing a hunter education certificate of competency or one of the following issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission:

A North Carolina hunting heritage apprentice permit.

A hunting license issued prior to July 1, 2013.

(a1)

A person who qualifies for a disabled license under

G.S. 113-270.1

C(b)(5) or (6),

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b)(7) or (8), or G.S. 113-351(c)(3)f. or g. need not comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section in order to receive that license, so long as the person does not make use of the license unless:

(1)

The disabled hunter is accompanied by an adult of at least 18 years of age who is licensed to hunt; and

(2)

The licensed adult maintains a proximity to the disabled hunter which enables the adult to monitor the activities of the disabled hunter by remaining within sight and hearing distance at all times without the use of electronic devices.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall institute and coordinate a statewide course of instruction in hunter ethics, wildlife laws and regulations, and competency and safety in the handling of firearms, and in so doing, may cooperate with any political subdivision, or with any reputable organization. The course of instruction shall be conducted as follows:

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall designate those persons or agencies authorized to give the course of instruction, and this designation shall be valid until revoked by the Commission. Those designated persons shall submit to the Wildlife Resources Commission validated listings naming all persons who have successfully completed the course of instruction.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may conduct the course in hunter education, using Commission personnel or Commission-approved persons.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall issue a certificate of competency and safety to each person who successfully completes the course of instruction, and the certificate shall be valid until revoked by the Commission.

Any similar certificate issued outside the State by a governmental agency, shall be accepted as complying with the requirements of subsection (a) above, if the privileges are reciprocal for North Carolina residents.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall adopt rules and regulations to provide for the course of instruction and the issuance of the certificates consistent with the purpose of this section.

On or after July 1, 2013, any person who obtains a hunting license by presenting a fictitious certificate of competency or who attempts to obtain a certificate of competency or hunting license through fraud shall have his hunting privileges revoked by the Wildlife Resources Commission for a period not to exceed one year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the lifetime licenses provided for in

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5), and 113-270.2(c)(2), and 113-351(c)(3) may be purchased by or in the name of persons who have not obtained a hunter education certificate of competency, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Pending satisfactory completion of the hunter education course, persons who possess one of the lifetime licenses specified in this subsection may exercise the privileges of the lifetime license only when accompanied by an adult of at least 18 years of age who is licensed to hunt in this State. For the purpose of this section, “accompanied” means that the licensed adult maintains a proximity that enables the adult to monitor the activities of the hunter by remaining within sight and hearing distance at all times without use of electronic devices.

History.

1989, c. 324, s. 1; 1991, c. 70, s. 1; 1997-365, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 27; 2005-438, s. 1; 2013-63, s. 1.

§ 113-270.1B.
License required to hunt, fish, or trap; fees set by Commission.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, no person may hunt, fish, trap, or participate in any other activity regulated by the Wildlife Resources Commission for which a license is provided by law without having first procured a current and valid license authorizing the activity.

Except as indicated otherwise, all licenses, permits, stamps, and certifications are valid from the date of issue for a period of 12 months.

As used in this section, the term “effective date” means the later of:

The date of purchase of a new license.

The first day after the expiration of a currently valid license of the same type held by the licensee.

For those licenses sold directly through the Commission by telephone, mail, online, or at a service counter, the Commission may charge a fee of two dollars ($2.00) per transaction. A fee may not be charged by the Commission for federal Harvest Information Program (HIP) certification, big game harvest report cards for lifetime license holders, exempt landowners, persons of less than 16 years of age, or for any other license or vessel transactions for which there is no charge.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall adopt rules to establish fees for all licenses, permits, stamps, and certifications issued and administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission, except those specified in

G.S. 113-173

. No rule may increase a fee in excess of the total increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, rounded up to the next whole dollar, over the period of time since the last fee change.The statutory fees for the hunting, fishing, trapping, and activity licenses issued and administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission shall expire when the rules adopted pursuant to this subsection become effective.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 1; 2012-81, s. 1; 2013-283, ss. 16, 20(b), (c); 2017-57, s. 13A.3; 2019-204, s. 6(a).

Local Modification.

Forsyth County: 2005-257, s. 1.

§ 113-270.1C.
Combination hunting and inland fishing licenses.

The combination hunting and inland fishing licenses set forth in subsection (b) of this section entitle the licensee to take all wild birds and wild animals, other than big game and waterfowl, by all lawful methods, except trapping, and in all open seasons, and to fish with hook and line in all inland and joint fishing waters, and public mountain trout waters, but does not entitle the licensee to engage in fishing in coastal fishing waters. A combination hunting and inland fishing license issued under this section entitles the licensee to access and use Wildlife Resources Commission Property.

Combination hunting and inland fishing licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are:

Resident Annual Combination Hunting and Inland Fishing License — $35.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State.

, (3) Repealed by Session Laws 1997-326, s. 2.

(4)

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.6, effective January 1, 2007.

(5)

Resident Disabled Veteran Lifetime Combination Hunting and Inland Fishing License — $10.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is a fifty percent (50%) or more disabled veteran as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. This license remains valid for the lifetime of the licensee.

(6)

Resident Totally Disabled Lifetime Combination Hunting and Inland Fishing License — $10.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is totally and permanently disabled as determined by the Social Security Administration. This license remains valid for the lifetime of the licensee.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 1; 1997-326, ss. 2, 3; 2001-91, s. 1; 2005-455, s. 1.6; 2013-283, s. 1; 2019-204, s. 6(b).

§ 113-270.1D.
Sportsman licenses.

Annual Sportsman License — $50.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State and entitles the licensee to take all wild animals and wild birds, including waterfowl, by all lawful methods, except trapping, in all open seasons, and to fish with hook and line for all fish in all inland and joint fishing waters, including public mountain trout waters, but does not entitle the licensee to engage in fishing in coastal waters. An annual sportsman license issued under this subsection entitles the licensee to access and use Wildlife Resources Commission Property.

Lifetime Sportsman Licenses. — Lifetime sportsman licenses are valid for the lifetime of the licensees. Lifetime sportsman licenses entitle the licensees to take all wild animals and wild birds by all lawful methods, except trapping, in all open seasons, and to fish with hook and line for all fish in all inland and joint fishing waters, including public mountain trout waters, but do not entitle the licensee to engage in fishing in coastal fishing waters, except if the license was purchased before January 1, 2006, pursuant to G.S. 113-174.2(d)(2). A lifetime sportsman license issued under this subsection entitles the licensee to access and use Wildlife Resources Commission Property. Lifetime sportsman licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are:

Infant Lifetime Sportsman License — $200.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual under one year of age.

Youth Lifetime Sportsman License — $350.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual under 12 years of age.

Adult Resident Lifetime Sportsman License — $500.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State who is 12 years of age or older but younger than 70 years of age. Except for individuals qualifying for a discounted license pursuant to G.S. 113-276(o), a resident who is 50 years of age or older but younger than 70 years of age shall be eligible to purchase this license at fifty percent (50%) of the applicable fee.

Nonresident Lifetime Sportsman License — $1,200. This license shall be issued only to an individual nonresident of the State.

Age 70 Resident Lifetime Sportsman License — $15.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State who is at least 70 years of age.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.7. effective January 1, 2007.

Resident Disabled Veteran Lifetime Sportsman License — $100.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is a fifty percent (50%) or more disabled veteran as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or as established by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Resident Totally Disabled Lifetime Sportsman License — $100.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is totally and permanently disabled as determined by the Social Security Administration or as established by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Fallen Wildlife Officers Memorial Lifetime Sportsman License. — This license shall also be known as the John Oliver Edwards Memorial Lifetime Sportsman License and shall be issued free of charge only to a surviving spouse, child, grandchild, or great-grandchild of a wildlife enforcement officer killed in the line of duty.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 1; 1997-326, s. 1; 1999-339, s. 4; 2005-455, s. 1.7; 2013-283, s. 2; 2014-100, s. 14.25(e); 2018-82, s. 1; 2019-204, s. 6(c); 2021-160, s. 8(a).

§ 113-270.2.
Hunting licenses.

The hunting licenses set forth in subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of subsection (c) of this section entitle the holder to take wild birds and wild animals, other than big game and waterfowl, by all lawful methods, except trapping, and in all open seasons. Unless otherwise specified, a hunting license issued under this subsection entitles the licensee to access and use Wildlife Resources Commission Property. The comprehensive hunting licenses of subdivisions (2) and (5) of subsection (c) of this section further entitle the holder to take big game and waterfowl.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 2.

The hunting licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are as follows:

Resident State Hunting License — $25.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State.

Lifetime Resident Comprehensive Hunting License — $250.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State and is valid for the lifetime of the holder.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-283, s. 3, effective August 1, 2014.

Controlled Hunting Preserve Hunting License — $20.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident or nonresident to take only foxes, coyotes, rabbits, and domestically raised chukars, Hungarian partridges, and game birds, other than wild turkey, only within a controlled hunting preserve licensed and operated in accordance with G.S. 113-273(g) and implementing rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license does not authorize access to or use of Wildlife Resources Commission Property.

Resident Annual Comprehensive Hunting License — $36.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State.

Nonresident State Hunting License.— This license shall be issued only to a nonresident. The nonresident State hunting licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are:

Season License — $100.00.

Ten-Day License — $80.00. This license is valid for the 10 consecutive dates indicated on the license.

Falconry Hunting License — $25.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident or nonresident and authorizes taking wildlife by means of falconry. In addition to a falconry hunting license, the license holder shall also possess a valid falconry license as described in G.S. 113-270.3(b)(4). This license expires June 30.

One dollar ($1.00) of the proceeds received from the sale of each nonresident hunting license sold pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection (c) of this section shall be set aside by the Wildlife Resources Commission and contributed to a proper agency or agencies in the United States for expenditure in Canada for the restoration and management of migratory waterfowl.

History.

1935, c. 486, s. 12; 1937, c. 45, s. 1; 1945, c. 617; 1949, c. 1203, s. 1; 1957, c. 849, s. 1; 1959, c. 304; 1961, c. 384, s. 1; 1967, c. 790; 1969, c. 1030; c. 1042, ss. 1-5, 13; 1971, c. 242; c. 282, s. 1; c. 705, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1975, c. 197, ss. 1-4, 6, 8; c. 673, s. 2; 1977, c. 658; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1178, s. 1; 1981, c. 482, s. 4; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1201, s. 1; 1983, c. 140, s. 1; 1987, c. 156, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1989, c. 324, s. 2; c. 616, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 909, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 2; 1999-339, s. 5; 2001-91, s. 2; 2013-283, s. 3; 2019-204, s. 6(d).

Cross References.

As to the Wildlife Endowment Fund, see

G.S. 143-250.1

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-283, s. 3, effective August 1, 2014, substituted “$20.00” for “$15.00” in subdivisions (c)(1) and (c)(4); deleted subdivision (c)(3); substituted “$36.00” for “$30.00” in subdivision (c)(5); substituted “$80.00” for “$60.00” in sub-subdivision (c)(6)a.; and, in sub-subdivision (c)(6)b., substituted “Ten-Day” for “Six-Day,” “$60.00” for “$40.00,” and “10” for “six.”

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(d), effective September 1, 2019, rewrote subsections (a) and (c).

§ 113-270.2A.
Voluntary contribution to hunter education program.

A person applying for a hunting license may make a voluntary contribution to the Wildlife Resources Commission for the purpose of funding a hunter education program.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall devise administrative procedure for the collection of all contributions donated pursuant to the provisions of this act and shall collect and use the contributions to fund and provide for a hunter education program.

History.

1979, c. 764, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 2013-63, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-63, s. 2, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “hunter” for “hunters safety” in the section heading; deleted “of fifty cents (50¢)” preceding “to the Wildlife Resources Commission” in subsection (a); and deleted “safety” preceding “education program” in subsections (a) and (b).

§ 113-270.2B.
Voluntary migratory waterfowl conservation print.

The Wildlife Resources Commission has exclusive production rights for the voluntary migratory waterfowl conservation print, and is authorized to adopt policy for the annual selection of an appropriate design for the print and to have the print produced for sale. This policy may include ownership rights of the original art selected; arrangements for the reproduction, distribution and marketing of prints; and provisions for sharing the resulting revenues.

The proceeds accruing to the Commission from its share of the voluntary migratory waterfowl conservation prints shall be used by the Commission for the benefit of migratory waterfowl management in North Carolina.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1269; 1987, c. 452, s. 1; c. 827, s. 98.

§ 113-270.3.
Special activity licenses; big game kill reports.

In addition to any hunting, trapping, or fishing license that may be required pursuant to

G.S. 113-270.1

B(a), individuals engaging in specially regulated activities must have the appropriate special activity license and stamp prescribed in this section before engaging in the regulated activity.

The special activity licenses and stamp issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are as follows:

Resident Big Game Hunting License — $13.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State and entitles the holder to take big game by all lawful methods and during all open seasons.

(1a)

Nonresident Bear Hunting License — $225.00. This license is valid for use only by an individual within the State and must be procured before taking any bear within the State. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a nonresident individual may not take any bear within the State without procuring this license; provided, that neither those persons who have a nonresident lifetime sportsman combination license purchased prior to May 24, 1994, nor those persons who have obtained a lifetime license established by

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b)(9) shall have to purchase this license. This license expires June 30.

(1b)

Bear Management Stamp — $10.00. This electronically generated stamp must be procured before taking any bear within the State. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a resident or nonresident individual may not take any bear within the State without procuring this stamp; provided, that those persons who have purchased a lifetime license established by

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b), 113-270.2(c)(2), or 113-351(c)(3) prior to July 1, 2014, those persons who have obtained a lifetime license established by G.S. 113-270.1D(b)(9), and those persons exempt from the license requirements as set forth in G.S. 113-276(c), G.S. 113-276(d), and G.S. 113-276(n) shall obtain this stamp free of charge. All of the revenue generated by this stamp shall be dedicated to black bear research and management. This stamp expires June 30.

Nonresident Big Game Hunting License. This license shall be issued only to an individual nonresident of the State and entitles the holder to take big game by all lawful methods and during all open seasons. The nonresident big game hunting licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are:

Season License — $100.00.

Ten-Day License — $80.00. This license is only valid for the 10 consecutive dates indicated on the license.

(2a)

Bonus Antlerless Deer License — $10.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident or nonresident of the State who holds a valid North Carolina big game hunting license or an individual resident who is exempt from the hunting license requirement in accordance with G.S. 113-276(c) and G.S. 113-276(d) and entitles the holder to take two antlerless deer during seasons and by methods authorized by the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license expires June 30.

Game Land License — $15.00. The Wildlife Resources Commission may, pursuant to G.S. 113-264(a), designate in its rules activities on game lands that require purchase of this license and may charge additional fees for use of specially developed facilities.

Falconry License — $10.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident or nonresident of the State and must be procured before:

Taking, importing, transporting, or possessing a raptor; or

Taking wildlife by means of falconry.

In addition to a falconry license, license holders 16 years of age and older must also possess a hunting license as set forth in G.S. 113-270.1C, 113-270.1D, and 113-270.2 when taking wildlife by means of falconry. The Wildlife Resources Commission may issue classes of falconry licenses necessary to participate in the federal/State permit system, require necessary examinations before issuing licenses or permits to engage in various authorized activities related to possession and maintenance of raptors and the sport of falconry, and regulate licenses as required by governing federal law and rules. To defray the costs of administering required examinations, the Wildlife Resources Commission may charge reasonable fees upon giving them. To meet minimum federal standards plus other State standards in the interests of conservation of wildlife resources, the Wildlife Resources Commission may impose all necessary controls, including those set out in the sections pertaining to collection licenses and captivity licenses, and may issue permits and require reports, but no collection license or captivity license is needed in addition to the falconry license.

Migratory Waterfowl Hunting License — $13.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident or nonresident of the State and entitles the holder to take migratory waterfowl in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. The Wildlife Resources Commission may implement this license requirement through the sale of an official waterfowl stamp which may be a facsimile, in an appropriate size, of the waterfowl conservation print authorized by

G.S. 113-270.2

B. An amount not less than one-half of the annual proceeds from the sale of this license shall be used by the Commission for cooperative waterfowl habitat improvement projects through contracts with local waterfowl interests, with the remainder of the proceeds to be used by the Commission in its statewide programs for the conservation of waterfowl.

Resident American Alligator License — $250.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident of the State and entitles the holder to take American alligator during the open alligator season by methods authorized by the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license expires June 30.

Nonresident American Alligator License — $500.00. This license shall be issued to an individual nonresident of the State and entitles the holder to take American alligator during the open alligator season by methods authorized by the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license expires June 30.

Resident Elk License — $500.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident of the State and entitles the holder to take elk during the open elk season by methods authorized by the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license expires June 30.

Nonresident Elk License — $1,000. This license shall be issued to an individual nonresident of the State and entitles the holder to take elk during the open elk season by methods authorized by the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license expires June 30.

Any individual who kills any species of big game must report the kill to the Wildlife Resources Commission. The Commission may by rule prescribe the method of making the report, prescribe its contents, and require positive identification of the carcass of the kill, by tagging or otherwise. The Wildlife Resources Commission may administratively provide for the annual issuance of big game tags or other identification for big game authorized by this section to holders of lifetime sportsman licenses and lifetime comprehensive hunting licenses.

Any individual who possesses any of the lifetime sportsman licenses established by

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b) may engage in specially regulated activities without the licenses required by subdivisions (1), (2), (3), and (5) of subsection (b) of this section. Any individual possessing an annual sportsman license established by

G.S. 113-270.1

D(a) or a lifetime or annual comprehensive hunting license established by G.S.113-270.2(c)(2) or (5) may engage in specially regulated activities without the licenses required by subdivisions (1), (3), and (5) of subsection (b) of this section.

When the Wildlife Resources Commission establishes a primitive weapons season pursuant to G.S. 113-291.2(a), all of the combination hunting and fishing licenses established in G.S.113-270.1C, sportsman licenses established in

G.S. 113-270.1

D, and hunting licenses established in G.S. 113-270.2(c)(1), (2), (3), (5), and (6) entitle the holder to participate. For purposes of this section, “primitive weapons” include bow and arrow, muzzle-loading firearm, and any other primitive weapon specified in the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

History.

1969, c. 1042, s. 7; 1973, c. 1097, s. 1; 1975, c. 171; c. 197, ss. 5, 7; c. 673, s. 1; 1977, c. 746, s. 1; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1178, ss. 2, 5; 1981, c. 482, s. 7; c. 620, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1201, s. 2; 1983, c. 140, ss. 2-3; 1987, c. 156, ss. 3-5; c. 452, ss. 2, 3; c. 745, s. 2; c. 827, s. 98; 1991, c. 671, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 557, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 3; 1999-339, s. 6; 2001-91, s. 3; 2006-226, s. 21; 2009-214, s. 1; 2011-369, s. 3; 2013-283, s. 4; 2014-100, s. 14.25(a); 2018-82, s. 2; 2018-90, s. 2; 2019-204, s. 6(e).

§ 113-270.4.
Hunting and fishing guide license.

No one may serve for hire as a hunting or fishing guide without having first procured a current and valid hunting and fishing guide license. This license is valid only for use by an individual meeting the criteria set by the Wildlife Resources Commission for issuance of the license subject to the limitations set forth in this section. Possession of the hunting and fishing guide license does not relieve the guide from meeting other applicable license requirements.

The hunting and fishing guide licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources are:

Resident Hunting and Fishing Guide License — $15.00. This license is valid for use only by an individual resident of the State.

Nonresident Hunting and Fishing Guide License — $150.00. This license is valid for use by a nonresident individual in the State.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule provide for the qualifications and duties of hunting and fishing guides. In implementing this section, the Wildlife Resources Commission may delegate to the Executive Director and his subordinates administrative responsibilities concerning the selection and supervision of hunting and fishing guides, except that provisions relating to revocation of hunting and fishing guide licenses must be substantially set out in the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

History.

1935, c. 486, s. 12; 1937, c. 45, s. 1; 1945, c. 617; 1949, c. 1203, s. 1; 1957, c. 849, s. 1; 1959, c. 304; 1961, c. 834, s. 1; 1967, c. 790; 1969, c. 1030; c. 1042, ss. 1-5; 1971, c. 242, c. 282, s. 1; c. 705, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1975, c. 197, ss. 1-4; 1977, c. 658; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1201, s. 3; 1983, c. 140, s. 4; 1987, c. 156, s. 6; c. 827, s. 98; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 989, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 32.1; 2001-91, s. 4; 2013-283, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-283, s. 5, effective August 1, 2014, substituted “15.00” for “$10.00” in subdivision (b)(1); and substituted “$150.00” for “$100.00” in subdivision (b)(2).

§ 113-270.5.
Trapping licenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, no person may take wild animals by trapping during open trapping seasons without a valid trapping license.

The trapping licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are as follows and entitle the licensee to access and use Wildlife Resource Commission Property:

Resident State Trapping License — $30.00. This license is valid only for use by an individual resident of the State.

(1a)

Resident Lifetime Trapping License — $300.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State and is valid for the lifetime of the licensee.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-283, s. 6, effective August 1, 2014.

Nonresident State Trapping License — $125.00. This license is valid for use by an individual within the State.

History.

1929, c. 278, s. 3; 1969, c. 1042, s. 6; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1975, c. 197, ss. 9-11; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1201, s. 4; 1983, c. 140, s. 5; 1987, c. 156, s. 7; c. 827, s. 98; 2001-91, s. 5; 2013-283, s. 6; 2019-204, s. 6(f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-283, s. 6, effective August 1, 2014, substituted “30.00” for “$25.00” in subdivision (b)(1); deleted subdivision (b)(2); and substituted “$125.00” for “$100.00” in subdivision (b)(3).

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(f), effective September 1, 2019, rewrote subsection (a); rewrote subsection (b), which formerly read: “The trapping licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are as follows”; and added subdivision (b)(1a).